dev/nouns.chopped.dix
    <pardef n="nu/lle__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lles</l>
          <r>lle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llei</l>
          <r>lle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lli</l>
          <r>lle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llē</l>
          <r>lle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lli</l>
          <r>lle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lle</l>
          <r>lle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lles</l>
          <r>lle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lle</l>
          <r>lle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ļļu</l>
          <r>lle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llēm</l>
          <r>lle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lles</l>
          <r>lle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llēs</l>
          <r>lle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llēm</l>
          <r>lle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lles</l>
          <r>lle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llēm</l>
          <r>lle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lles</l>
          <r>lle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Bībel/e__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ei</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ē</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēm</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēs</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēm</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēm</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="būv/e__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ei</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ē</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ju</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēm</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēs</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēm</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēm</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="apbūve"><i>apbūv</i><par n="būv/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="apkaime"><i>apkaim</i><par n="būv/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="attieksme"><i>attieksm</i><par n="būv/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="būve"><i>būv</i><par n="būv/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="dome"><i>dom</i><par n="būv/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="drēbe"><i>drēb</i><par n="būv/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="dzīve"><i>dzīv</i><par n="būv/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ieguve"><i>ieguv</i><par n="būv/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ietekme"><i>ietekm</i><par n="būv/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="iezīme"><i>iezīm</i><par n="būv/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="izcelsme"><i>izcelsm</i><par n="būv/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="izpausme"><i>izpausm</i><par n="būv/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="izteiksme"><i>izteiksm</i><par n="būv/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="nāve"><i>nāv</i><par n="būv/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="nozīme"><i>nozīm</i><par n="būv/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="nulle"><i>nu</i><par n="nu/lle__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="padome"><i>padom</i><par n="būv/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pakāpe"><i>pakāp</i><par n="būv/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pazeme"><i>pazem</i><par n="būv/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pazīme"><i>pazīm</i><par n="būv/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="rezerve"><i>rezerv</i><par n="būv/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sadursme"><i>sadursm</i><par n="būv/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sadzīve"><i>sadzīv</i><par n="būv/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="saime"><i>saim</i><par n="būv/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sakāve"><i>sakāv</i><par n="būv/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sāpe"><i>sāp</i><par n="būv/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="satiksme"><i>satiksm</i><par n="būv/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="satversme"><i>satversm</i><par n="būv/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="skatuve"><i>skatuv</i><par n="būv/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="straume"><i>straum</i><par n="būv/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="uzbūve"><i>uzbūv</i><par n="būv/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="vēlme"><i>vēlm</i><par n="būv/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="zeme"><i>zem</i><par n="būv/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="zīme"><i>zīm</i><par n="būv/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Bībele"><i>Bībel</i><par n="Bībel/e__n_f"/></e>
